02_Morphology/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное - Noun
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число - Plural
%<nom%>	 ! Nominative case
%<ins%>		! Instrumental case
%<gen%>		!Genitive case
%<der_лӑх%>     !Derivational suffix - Makes abstract
%<abl%>		!Ablative

%>                   ! Граница морфемы - Morpheme boundary

%{A%}		!Archimorpheme [a] or [e]
%{м%}		!Archimorpheme [m] or 0
%{Ă%}		!Archimorpheme for ӑ or ӗ 
%{ъ%}		!Archimorpheme force back vowel
%{л%}		!Archimorpheme for -m, -l, -r
%{с%}		!Archimorpheme for ~ {-m, -l, -r}
%{э%}		!Front V
%{а%}		!Back V
%{z%}		!Cyrillic -t or -r	



LEXICON Root

Guesser ; 

LEXICON CASES 

%<nom%>:%>  # ;
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;
%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н #;
%<abl%>:%>%{z%}%{Ă%}н # ;

LEXICON SUBST

PLURAL ;

LEXICON PLURAL

             CASES  ; 
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES  ;

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>:%- CASES ;


LEXICON LAST-DIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "пӗр" 
2:2%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "иккӗ" 
3:3%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "виҫҫӗ" 
4:4%{с%}%{а%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тӑваттӑ" 
5:5%{э%}%{с%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "пиллӗк" 
6:6%{с%}%{а%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "улттӑ" 
7:7%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "ҫиччӗ" 
8:8%{э%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "саккӑр" 
9:9%{э%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тӑххӑр" 

LEXICON LOOP

                 LAST-DIGIT ; 
                 DIGITLEX ; 

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

LEXICON DER-N

%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0";

LEXICON N 

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ; 

LEXICON Guesser

🂡%<guess%>:🂡 N ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица" "street"
пакча:пакча N ;   ! "сад", "garden"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город", "city"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет", "council"
тӗс:тӗс N ;       ! "вид", "aspect"
патша:патша N ;   ! "царь", "tsar"
куҫ:куҫ N ;       ! "глаз", "eye"
патшалӑх:патшалӑх N ;      !"state"
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ; ! "специалист", "specialist"
